Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 5

Personal Watercraft

69-9-501. “Personal watercraft” defined.

As used in this part, “personal watercraft” means a mechanically propelled vessel that is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing or kneeling on the vessel rather than being operated in a conventional manner by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling inside the vessel. It includes, but is not limited to, Jet Skis, Waverunners, Sea-Doos, Wetjets, Aquajets, Polaris, Tigersharks, and similar craft.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-501.

Compiler's Notes. One or more of the specific personal watercraft itemized in this section are trademarked name brands and the trademarks are hereby acknowledged.

69-9-502. Flotation devices.

A person may not operate a personal watercraft on the waters of Tennessee unless each person aboard the vessel, or being towed by the vessel, is wearing a United States coast guard (USCG) approved Type I, II, III, or V personal flotation device in accordance with the USCG approval label.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-502; Acts 2007, ch. 185, § 18.

69-9-503. Engine cutoff switches.

A person operating a personal watercraft on the waters of Tennessee shall have a lanyard type engine cutoff switch and must attach the lanyard to the person, clothing, or personal flotation device as is appropriate.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to a person operating a personal watercraft that was not equipped with a lanyard type engine cutoff switch at the time of production by the manufacturer.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-503; Acts 2016, ch. 572, § 1.

69-9-504. Safe operating requirements — Prohibited maneuvers — Warning flags.

A personal watercraft shall at all times be operated on the waters of Tennessee in a reasonable and prudent manner. Maneuvers that endanger life, limb, or property, or create a public nuisance shall constitute reckless operation of a vessel as provided in § 69-9-216(a) and shall be punished upon conviction as provided in § 69-9-219. These acts shall include, but not be limited to:

Weaving through congested vessel traffic at high speed;

Following within the wake, and closely behind, a vessel towing a person or persons on water skis or other water sport devices;

Cutting between a boat and the person or persons being towed by that boat;

Crossing in close proximity to the stern of another vessel or when visibility around the other vessel is obstructed;

Steering a vessel toward any object or person in the water and turning sharply at close range so as to spray the object or person; and

Jumping the wake of another vessel within one hundred feet (100') of that vessel.

If the operator of a vessel feels that the operation of a personal watercraft is creating a hazard to that vessel or a person being towed by that vessel, they shall exhibit an orange flag and wave it in such a manner to signal the operator of the personal watercraft to steer away, or to take such action that will end the hazard. The flag shall be no less than twelve inches (12") by twelve inches (12") in size.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-504.

69-9-505. Operation by children prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person under twelve (12) years of age to operate a personal watercraft upon the waters of Tennessee unless such person is under the direct supervision of an adult. “Direct supervision” means being in such proximity with the operator so as to be able to take immediate control of the vessel.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-505.

69-9-506. Leasing of personal watercraft by persons under sixteen (16) years of age prohibited.

No person under sixteen (16) years of age may rent or attempt to hire, lease, or rent a personal watercraft. It shall be illegal for any marina, livery, or rental operation to hire, lease, or rent a personal watercraft to any person under sixteen (16) years of age. Further, no marina, livery, or other rental operation may hire, lease, or rent a personal watercraft to any first-time renter until the rental operation at first provides an orientation, approved by the wildlife resources agency, to the renter containing at least the following information: basic operation of the craft, including steering capability when the power is decreased or at idle; required safety equipment and the use of the engine cutoff switch; rules of the road; meaning of the state uniform waterway marking system buoys; regulations regarding wake-jumping and other regulations specific to personal watercraft. Further, the renter must acknowledge in writing that the renter has received such instruction, the marina, livery, or other rental operation must keep on file such acknowledgment for a period of at least thirty (30) days, and such record shall be available for inspection by enforcement officers during regular business hours.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; 2000, ch. 830, § 4; T.C.A. §69-10-506.

69-9-507. Towing safety — Rearview mirrors.

No person shall utilize a personal watercraft to tow a person or persons on water skis or other water sport devices unless the personal watercraft has an observer on board, at least twelve (12) years of age, who can constantly observe the person or persons being towed, or it is equipped with rearview mirrors meeting the specifications established by statute or regulation of the commission.

The specifications for rearview mirrors on personal watercraft used for towing any person shall be as follows: Each mirror shall contain a minimum viewing size of sixty-five (65) square centimeters (10 sq. in.), a minimum viewing area height of sixty-four (64) millimeters (2.5 in.), and minimum viewing area width of one hundred (100) millimeters (4.0 in.). The mirrors shall be mounted or attached on both the right and left sides of the personal watercraft so as to provide the maximum rearward observation by the operator. Mirrors shall not be mounted or attached to the steering mechanism of the personal watercraft. The minimum combined viewing area of both mirrors shall be one hundred thirty (130) square centimeters (20 sq. in.).

It is a Class A misdemeanor to tow any person by personal watercraft unless the watercraft meets all of these specifications.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 595, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-507.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-9-508. Watercraft owner not to violate this part — Exceptions to this part.

It is unlawful for the owner of any personal watercraft or any person having charge of or control of a personal watercraft to authorize or knowingly permit these to be operated on the waters of this state by a person in violation of this part.

This part does not apply to a performer engaged in professional exhibition or a person participating in a regatta, race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition, and any rules and regulations issued by the commission.

Acts 1996, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-508.

69-9-222. Report of fines and forfeitures — Disposition of funds.

69-9-224. Termination of unsafe use.